Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1751.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Short title.This act shall be known and may be cited as the Employee Ownership Assistance Program Act.Section 2. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Board." The Employee Ownership Advisory Board established under section 7(a)."Department." The Department of Community and Economic Development of the Commonwealth.12345678910111213141516171819 "Employee-owned enterprise." One of the following:(1) A business that meets one of the following conditions:(i) The business is organized as:(A) an eligible worker-owned cooperative as defined under 26 U.S.C. § 1042 (relating to sales of stock to employee stock ownership plans or certain cooperatives); or(B) a corporation in which the employees own the stock of the corporation through an employee stock ownership plan, within the meaning of 26 U.S.C. § 4975(e)(7) (relating to tax on prohibited transactions).(ii) The following apply to voting rights and shares of the business:(A) A majority of the voting rights of the business are held by employees and all employees who have stock allocated to them are entitled to vote.(B) Shares of the business are voted in such a manner that the vote of the majority of the employees of the business controls the vote of the majority of shares.(C) Voting rights on corporate matters for shares held in a trust for the employees of the business shall pass through to those employees, at least to the extent required by the pass-through voting requirements under 26 U.S.C. § 864(c)(4)(D) (relating to definitions and special rules).(iii) The majority of the members of the board of directors of the business are elected by the employees.20250HB1751PN2158 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (2) A business that is organized in a manner determined by the secretary to involve substantial employee participation.(3) An employee-ownership trust."Employee-ownership group." A corporation or other entity, including a labor union formed by or on behalf of the current or former employees of an industrial or commercial firm or facility located in this Commonwealth for the purpose of assuming ownership or control of the firm or facility and operating it as an employee-owned enterprise."Employee-ownership trust." Company stock or profit sharing being held by a trustee on behalf of the company's employees with employees receiving a percentage of ongoing profits or 401(k) retirement plans throughout employment without receiving an equity stake in the company."Local administrative agency." An organization that enters into a written agreement with the department to administer technical and financial assistance under this act, including:(1) A municipality.(2) A local development district of the Appalachian Regional Commission.(3) A certified economic development organization certified by The Pennsylvania Industrial Development Authority under 64 Pa.C.S. § 1123 (relating to certification of economic development organizations).(4) A nonprofit economic development organization designated by the secretary."Office." The Office of Employee Ownership established under section 3(a)."Secretary." The Secretary of Community and Economic 20250HB1751PN2158 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Development of the Commonwealth.Section 3. Office of Employee Ownership.(a) Establishment and purpose.--(1) The Office of Employee Ownership is established in the department.(2) The office shall:(i) Serve as an advocate for improving government knowledge and support for well-designed, broad-based profit-sharing and ownership stakes.(ii) Increase awareness of how agency programs affect companies with profit-sharing and ownership stake programs.(iii) Promote legislative or regulatory changes necessary to ensure that government policies encourage the adoption of existing and emerging sharing programs.(b) Gubernatorial appointment.--The Governor shall appoint an employee ownership advocate. The employee ownership advocate shall be an individual who by reason of training, experience or attainment is qualified to represent the interest of employee-owned enterprises. The following apply to the employee ownership advocate:(1) No individual who serves as an employee ownership advocate shall, while serving in the position, engage in any business, vocation or other employment, or have other interests, inconsistent with the individual's official responsibilities.(2) The individual serving as an employee ownership advocate may not seek or accept employment or render beneficial services for compensation with any person or corporation, as defined in 66 Pa.C.S. § 102 (relating to 20250HB1751PN2158 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 definitions), during the tenure of the appointment and for a period of two years after the appointment is served or terminated.(3) An individual who is appointed to the position of employee ownership advocate may not seek election or accept appointment to any public office during the tenure as the employee ownership advocate.(4) The employee ownership advocate shall oversee the office and the programs established in this act.(c) Duties.--The office shall aid and guide businesses on the benefits and formation of an employee-owned enterprise by providing outreach, education and technical assistance. The office shall:(1) Establish a robust and wide-reaching network of technical support for businesses wishing to convert to employee-owned enterprises.(2) Prepare and make publicly accessible in print and on the office's publicly accessible Internet website information to educate and guide business owners and employees in this Commonwealth on the benefits and formation of employee-owned enterprises.(3) Educate businesses and communities across this Commonwealth on the economic and community benefits of employee-owned enterprises.(4) Identify barriers to the development and advancement of employee-owned enterprises and recommend State actions and resources to remove barriers.(5) Gather and maintain statistics on all employee-owned enterprises in place across this Commonwealth.(6) Evaluate and submit a report by December 31 of each 20250HB1751PN2158 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 year to the Community, Economic and Recreational Development Committee of the Senate and the Commerce Committee of the House of Representatives. Each report must include:(i) The results of the office's efforts, impacts and benefits.(ii) A list of all employee-owned enterprises in this Commonwealth and the counties in which the employee-owned enterprises are located.(iii) Recommendations on the most effective utilization of Commonwealth funding to encourage the formation of employee-owned enterprises.(iv) Other information deemed necessary by the employee ownership advocate.(7) Select and fund a Pennsylvania 501(c)(3) nonprofit organization defined under 26 U.S.C. § 501(c)(3) (relating to exemption from tax on corporations, certain trusts, etc.) with well-established knowledge of employee-owned enterprises to work with the office and the department to ensure the execution requirements under this act.Section 4. Technical and financial assistance program.The office shall establish a technical and financial assistance program to promote the development of employee-owned enterprises.Section 5. Technical assistance.(a) Authorization to allocate money.--The office may allocate or distribute money to local administrative agencies for the purpose of providing grants and loans to employee-ownership groups in industrial facilities and commercial facilities, as those terms are defined in section 3 of the act of August 23, 1967 (P.L.251, No.102), known as the Economic 20250HB1751PN2158 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Development Financing Law, for technical assistance to develop or improve an employee-owned enterprise.(b) Eligibility.--(1) An employee-ownership group shall be eligible for assistance if the employees in the employee-ownership group are employed by, formerly employed by or affiliated with one of the following:(i) An existing firm facing a threat of substantial layoffs or a plant closing and investigating a reorganization of all or some portion of the firm's business activity, at sites located within this Commonwealth, as an employee-owned enterprise.(ii) An existing firm, not necessarily facing a threat of substantial layoffs or a plant closing but considering a conversion to an employee-owned enterprise and seeking professional services to accomplish the conversion if conversion to employee ownership will create new jobs or retain existing jobs at sites in this Commonwealth.(iii) An existing firm which currently has some form of employee ownership and requires professional services to ensure success of the employee-owned enterprise in the effort to create new jobs or retain existing jobs at sites in this Commonwealth.(2) For purposes of this subsection, the term "existing firm" shall include an ongoing concern, the assets of an existing company or the assets of a company that has been closed for no more than one year as of the date of application for the feasibility study.(c) Use of awarded money.--An employee-ownership group may 20250HB1751PN2158 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 be awarded sums of money for the following purposes:(1) Feasibility studies to investigate a reorganization or new incorporation as an employee-owned enterprise. At a minimum, the feasibility study shall:(i) Assess the market value and demand for the product produced by the plant affected by the closing or layoff.(ii) Assess the market value and demand for other products that could be manufactured or assembled at the plant affected by the closing or layoff.(iii) Evaluate the production costs to be incurred if the plant were to be operated by the employee-ownership group.(2) Professional services to implement a feasibility study and other professional services to develop or ensure the success of an employee-owned enterprise.(d) Repayment of awarded money.--Money awarded to an employee-ownership group under subsection (c) is subject to the following repayment conditions:(1) If the enterprise studied is purchased or improved by the employee-ownership group, the sum of money awarded will constitute a loan and the employee-ownership group shall repay the entire amount of the loan, with interest, in a lump sum at the closing of the purchase of the company or within one year after the date of the release of the loan by the office, whichever occurs later. The amount of the loan repaid shall be returned to the office for the purpose of issuing additional loans. The interest paid on the loan shall be used by the office for administrative costs associated with administering this act.20250HB1751PN2158 - 8 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (2) If the enterprise studied is not purchased by the employee-ownership group within one year after the completion of the feasibility study, and the enterprise makes a good faith effort to pursue conversion, the money will constitute a grant.(3) The office shall evaluate the employee-ownership group's final report under paragraph (2) to determine if repayment is feasible. If the office determines that the employee-ownership group is unable to repay the sum of awarded money, the amount of money that was awarded to the employee-ownership group will constitute a grant. If the office determines that the employee-ownership group is able to repay some or all of the money awarded, the amount of money that was awarded to the employee-ownership group will constitute a loan.(e) Other conditions.--(1) The applicant shall provide evidence that there is a prospect for recovery and future job growth or job retention in applications under subsection (b)(1)(i) or a substantial prospect of job growth or job retention in applications under subsection (b)(1)(ii) and (iii).(2) Maximum State participation shall be 50% of the total cost of the technical assistance and the maximum loan or grant amount shall be $35,000.Section 6. Financial assistance.(a) Authorization to allocate funds.--The office may allocate or distribute money to local administrative agencies for the purpose of providing loans and loan guarantees to employee-owned enterprises reorganizing industrial facilities, manufacturing facilities and agricultural enterprises as defined 20250HB1751PN2158 - 9 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 in section 3 of the act of May 17, 1956 (1955 P.L.1609, No.537), known as the Pennsylvania Industrial Development Authority Act, for the development of employee-owned enterprises.(b) Eligibility.--(1) Eligibility for assistance shall be limited to reorganizing an existing enterprise being evaluated for conversion to an employee ownership group, an organization which is facing a threat of substantial layoffs or a plant closing which may be assisted by conversion to employee ownership, a start-up organization seeking formation as a worker cooperative business or an existing employee ownership enterprise seeking funding to grow the business to create new jobs.(2) For purposes of this subsection, the term "existing enterprise" includes an ongoing concern, the assets of an existing company or the assets of a company which has been closed for no more than one year as of the date of completion of a feasibility study.Section 7. Employee Ownership Advisory Board.(a) Establishment.--The Employee Ownership Advisory Board is established within the department.(b) Powers and duties.--The board shall have the following powers and duties:(1) Raise awareness for employee-owned enterprises in this Commonwealth.(2) Research methods to encourage the development and expansion of employee-owned enterprises in this Commonwealth.(3) Make recommendations to the department and General Assembly on policies related to employee-owned enterprises.(4) Develop proposed best practices for employee-owned 20250HB1751PN2158 - 10 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 enterprises in this Commonwealth.(5) Develop educational materials and outreach opportunities for the maintenance and development of employee-owned enterprises in this Commonwealth.(c) Members.--The board shall be composed of the following members:(1) The Employee Ownership Advocate.(2) An employee owner.(3) A certified public accountant.(4) A representative from a worker-owned cooperative.(5) A representative from a federation of labor unions.(6) A representative from the banking industry or community development financial institution.(7) A regional advocate for business development.(8) A professor from an institution of higher education located in this Commonwealth with an expertise in employee ownership and labor relations.(9) A representative from a law firm with expertise in employee ownership.(10) A member of the Senate appointed by the President pro tempore of the Senate.(11) A member of the House of Representatives appointed by the Speaker of the House of Representatives.(d) Officers.--(1) The Employee Ownership Advocate shall serve as the chairperson of the board.(2) The board shall elect a vice chairperson from the members of the board.(e) Term.--Except for the Employee Ownership Advocate, all members of the board shall serve a term of four years and may 20250HB1751PN2158 - 11 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 serve on the board until a successor is appointed.(f) Compensation.--Members of the board shall not receive compensation for service on the board but shall be reimbursed for expenses incurred in the performance of their duties under this act.(g) Staff support.--The office shall provide staff support to the board.(h) Meetings.--The board shall meet at least twice each year to consider issues related to employee-owned enterprises and make recommendations to the department and General Assembly.(i) Reports.--(1) No later than December 31, 2025, and each December 31 thereafter, the board shall issue an annual report detailing recommendations and actions made by the board.(2) Each annual report under this subsection shall be submitted to:(i) The chairperson and minority chairperson of the Community, Economic and Recreational Development Committee of the Senate.(ii) The chairperson and minority chairperson of the Commerce Committee of the House of Representatives.Section 8. Main Street Employee Ownership Grant Program.(a) Establishment.--The Main Street Employee Ownership Grant Program is established within the office to provide grants to businesses that are eligible under subsection (b).(b) Eligibility.--A business is eligible for grants under this section if the business has fewer than 200 employees.(c) Use of grant.--Grant money awarded may be used by an eligible business to:(1) Establish a workers' cooperative in accordance with 20250HB1751PN2158 - 12 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 15 Pa.C.S. Ch. 77 (relating to workers' cooperative corporations).(2) Convert a business to an employee-owned enterprise.(3) Provide support for technical assistance, such as the proper management of an employee-owned enterprise, best business practices or other assistance approved by the office.(d) Limitation and approval.--Grant awards may not exceed $35,000. If a business is approved for a grant under this section, the business shall have an automatic approval for financial assistance under section 6.Section 9. Administration.(a) Responsibility of local administrative agencies.--Local administrative agencies shall promote the employee ownership program and the Main Street Employee Ownership Grant Program by soliciting applications, evaluating applications and making preliminary decisions on both technical assistance and financial assistance. Not more than 2% of the money appropriated for the purpose of this act may be used by local administrative agencies for the purpose of administering these programs.(b) Approval by employee ownership advocate.--The employee ownership advocate shall have full responsibility for final approval of all applications for assistance.(c) Advances.--The office may make money advances to local administrative agencies for the purpose of making loans, loan guarantees or grants consistent with this act. Advances under this section must be repaid to the office when the loan or loan guarantee is repaid by the borrower.(d) Rules and regulations.--The secretary may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations, statements of policy or forms, 20250HB1751PN2158 - 13 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 guidelines and other procedures, forms and requirements necessary for the implementation and administration of this act.Section 10. Indicators of program impact.(a) Report.--On March 1 of each year of the employee ownership program's and the Main Street Employee Ownership Grant Program's existence, the employee ownership advocate shall submit a report to the Secretary of the Senate and the Chief Clerk of the House of Representatives on the impact of the programs, including:(1) Rules, guidelines or statements of policy used in administering the programs.(2) The number of employee-ownership groups and firms applying for and receiving assistance.(3) The number of feasibility studies which were actually implemented.(4) The number of jobs retained or created and the number of jobs created or retained as a result of financial assistance.(5) Other information deemed necessary by the employee ownership advocate.(b) Information to office.--Recipients of assistance under these programs shall provide the office with the information needed to fulfill the reporting requirement under subsection (a).Section 11. Nondiscrimination.A loan, grant or other financial assistance may not be made to a recipient under this act unless the recipient certifies to the department, in a form satisfactory to the department, that the recipient will not discriminate against an employee or against an applicant for employment because of race, religion, 20250HB1751PN2158 - 14 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 color, national origin, sex or age.Section 12. Guidelines and regulations.(a) One-year exemption from review.--In order to facilitate implementation of this act, the department may promulgate, adopt and use temporary guidelines that shall be transmitted as a notice to the Legislative Reference Bureau for publication in the next available issue of the Pennsylvania Bulletin. The guidelines shall not be subject to review under any of the following:(1) Section 612 of the act of April 9, 1929 (P.L.177, No.175), known as The Administrative Code of 1929.(2) Sections 201, 202, 203, 204 and 205 of the act of July 31, 1968 (P.L.769, No.240), referred to as the Commonwealth Documents Law.(3) Section 204(b) of the act of October 15, 1980 (P.L. 950, No.164), known as the Commonwealth Attorneys Act.(4) The act of June 25, 1982 (P.L.633, No.181), known as the Regulatory Review Act.(b) Expiration of exemption.--After the expiration of the one-year period, all guidelines shall expire and shall be replaced by regulations that shall have been promulgated, adopted and published as provided by law.Section 13. Annual appropriation and funding sources.(a) Estimate of expenditures.--Before November 1 of each year, the employee ownership advocate shall estimate the total expenditures for the office and submit the estimate to the Governor in accordance with section 610 of the act of April 9, 1929 (P.L.177, No.175), known as The Administrative Code of 1929. At the same time the office submits the estimate to the Governor, the office shall also submit the estimate to the 20250HB1751PN2158 - 15 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 General Assembly. The following apply:(1) The employee ownership advocate shall be afforded an opportunity to appear before the Governor, the Appropriations Committee of the Senate and the Appropriations Committee of the House of Representatives regarding the estimate.(2) For each fiscal year, the office shall calculate the office's proposed appropriation by subtracting the unspent portion of the office's budget for the previous fiscal year from the total appropriation that was approved by the General Assembly. The remainder shall be allocated to the department for the next fiscal year.(b) Allocation of assessment.--For each fiscal year, the office shall determine for the preceding calendar year the amount of its expenditures directly attributable to administering this act as follows:(1) Expenditures of the office directly attributable to section 5.(2) Expenditures of the office directly attributable to section 6.(3) Expenditures of the office directly attributable to section 8.(4) Expenditures of the office directly attributable to section 9.(5) Total expenditures of the office directly attributable to administering this act.(c) Funding sources.--Any of the following may be used as funding sources for the office for the purposes of this act:(1) Money appropriated for the purposes of this act.(2) Federal money appropriated or authorized for the purposes of this act.20250HB1751PN2158 - 16 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (3) Money received from a State agency through an interagency agreement or memorandum of understanding.(4) A gift or other contribution from a public or private source.(5) Returns on money dedicated for the purposes of this act, including, but not limited to, interest on loans or loan guarantees.(6) Any appropriation that was unspent by the end of a previous fiscal year.Section 14. Effective date.This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1751PN2158 - 17 - 1234567891011